Florida, session 2026, SB1234.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 207 208 Section 1.âParagraph (d) of subsection (4) of section 209 125.56, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 210 125.56âEnforcement and amendment of the Florida Building 211 Code and the Florida Fire Prevention Code; inspection fees; 212 inspectors; etc.â 213 (4) 214 (d)âA county that issues building permits may send a 215 written notice of expiration, by e-mail or United States Postal 216 Service, to the owner of the property and the contractor listed 217 on the permit, no less than 30 days before a building permit is 218 set to expire. The written notice must identify the permit that 219 is set to expire and the date the permit will expire. A building 220 permit issued by a county for a single-family dwelling expires 1 221 year after the issuance of the permit or on the effective date 222 of the next edition of the Florida Building Code, whichever is 223 later; however, this paragraph does not prevent a local 224 government from extending the building permit beyond the 225 expiration date. 226 Section 2.âParagraph (o) of subsection (1) of section 227 489.129, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 228 489.129âDisciplinary proceedings.â 229 (1)âThe board may take any of the following actions against 230 any certificateholder or registrant: place on probation or 231 reprimand the licensee, revoke, suspend, or deny the issuance or 232 renewal of the certificate or registration, require financial 233 restitution to a consumer for financial harm directly related to 234 a violation of a provision of this part, impose an 235 administrative fine not to exceed $10,000 per violation, require 236 continuing education, or assess costs associated with 237 investigation and prosecution, if the contractor, financially 238 responsible officer, or business organization for which the 239 contractor is a primary qualifying agent, a financially 240 responsible officer, or a secondary qualifying agent responsible 241 under s. 489.1195 is found guilty of any of the following acts: 242 (o)âProceeding on any job without obtaining applicable 243 local building department permits and inspections, unless 244 otherwise provided by law. 245 246 For the purposes of this subsection, construction is considered 247 to be commenced when the contract is executed and the contractor 248 has accepted funds from the customer or lender. A contractor 249 does not commit a violation of this subsection when the 250 contractor relies on a building code interpretation rendered by 251 a building official or person authorized by s. 553.80 to enforce 252 the building code, absent a finding of fraud or deceit in the 253 practice of contracting, or gross negligence, repeated 254 negligence, or negligence resulting in a significant danger to 255 life or property on the part of the building official, in a 256 proceeding under chapter 120. 257 Section 3.âSection 553.382, Florida Statutes, is amended to 258 read: 259 553.382âPlacement of certain housing.âNotwithstanding any 260 other law or ordinance to the contrary, in order to expand the 261 availability of affordable housing in this state, any 262 residential manufactured building that is certified under this 263 chapter by the department may not be denied a building permit 264 for placement be placed on a mobile home lot in a mobile home 265 park, on any lot in a recreational vehicle park, or in a mobile 266 home condominium, cooperative, or subdivision. Any such housing 267 unit placed on a mobile home lot is a mobile home for purposes 268 of chapter 723 and, therefore, all rights, obligations, and 269 duties under chapter 723 apply, including the specifics of the 270 prospectus. However, a housing unit subject to this section may 271 not be placed on a mobile home lot without the prior written 272 approval of the park owner. Each housing unit located on a 273 mobile home lot and subject to this section must shall be taxed 274 as a mobile home under s. 320.08(11) and is subject to payments 275 to the Florida Mobile Home Relocation Fund under s. 723.06116. 276 Section 4.âSection 553.385, Florida Statutes, is created to 277 read: 278 553.385âPermitting and zoning of offsite-constructed 279 residential dwellings; parity.â 280 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 281 (a)ââLocal governmentâ means a county or municipality. 282 (b)ââOffsite-constructed residential dwellingâ means a 283 manufactured building as defined in s. 553.36(13) which is 284 intended for single-family residential use, or a manufactured 285 home as defined in s. 320.01(2)(b) which is constructed in whole 286 or in part offsite and is treated as real property. 287 (2)(a)âAn offsite-constructed residential dwelling must be 288 permitted as of right in any zoning district where single-family 289 detached dwellings are allowed. 290 (b)âA local government may not adopt or enforce any zoning, 291 land use, or development regulation that treats an offsite 292 constructed residential dwelling differently or more 293 restrictively than a single-family site-built dwelling allowed 294 in the same district. 295 (c)âThis section does not prohibit a local government from 296 applying generally applicable architectural, aesthetic, design, 297 setback, height, or bulk standards to offsite-constructed 298 residential dwellings, provided such standards apply equally to 299 site-built single-family dwellings permitted in the same 300 district. A local government may adopt compatibility standards 301 that are limited to the following architectural features: 302 1.âRoof pitch. 303 2.âSquare footage of livable space. 304 3.âType and quality of exterior finishing materials. 305 4.âFoundation enclosure. 306 5.âExistence and type of attached structures. 307 6.âBuilding setbacks, lot dimensions, and the orientation 308 of the home on the lot. 309 (d)âA local government may not treat offsite-constructed 310 residential dwellings differently than factory-built buildings 311 subject to s. 553.38 based on the method or location of 312 construction. 313 (3)âA local government may not adopt or enforce any zoning, 314 land use, or development ordinance or regulation that conflicts 315 with this section or s. 553.38, or that imposes different or 316 more restrictive treatment on an offsite-constructed residential 317 dwelling based on its method of construction or the presence of 318 components built off site. Local government ordinances or 319 regulations may not have the effect of excluding offsite 320 constructed residential dwellings and must be reasonable and 321 uniformly enforced without any distinction as to the type of 322 housing. Any such ordinance or regulation is void and 323 unenforceable as applied to offsite-constructed residential 324 dwellings. 325 Section 5.âPresent paragraphs (b) through (m) of subsection 326 (1) of section 553.77, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 327 paragraphs (c) through (n), respectively, a new paragraph (b) is 328 added to that subsection, and present paragraph (c) of that 329 subsection is amended, to read: 330 553.77âSpecific powers of the commission.â 331 (1)âThe commission shall: 332 (b)âBy July 1, 2027, adopt by rule a uniform commercial 333 building permit application to be used statewide for commercial 334 construction projects and a uniform residential building permit 335 application to be used statewide for residential construction 336 projects. To the extent feasible, the uniform building permit 337 applications adopted by the commission must be capable of 338 integration with existing building permit software systems 339 utilized by local governments and must account for local 340 amendments to the Florida Building Code. 341 (d)(c)âUpon written application by any substantially 342 affected person or a local enforcement agency, issue declaratory 343 statements pursuant to s. 120.565 relating to new technologies, 344 techniques, and materials which have been tested where necessary 345 and found to meet the objectives of the Florida Building Code. 346 This paragraph does not apply to the types of products, 347 materials, devices, or methods of construction required to be 348 approved under paragraph (g) (f). 349 Section 6.âParagraphs (a), (b), (c), and (f) of subsection 350 (1) and paragraph (a) of subsection (24) of section 553.79, 351 Florida Statutes, are amended, and paragraphs (g) through (j) 352 are added to subsection (1) of that section, to read: 353 553.79âPermits; applications; issuance; inspections.â 354 (1)(a)âUnless otherwise provided by law, after the 355 effective date of the Florida Building Code adopted as herein 356 provided, it is shall be unlawful for any person, firm, 357 corporation, or governmental entity to construct, erect, alter, 358 modify, repair, or demolish any building within this state 359 without first obtaining a permit therefor from the appropriate 360 enforcing agency or from such persons as may, by appropriate 361 resolution or regulation of the authorized state or local 362 enforcing agency, be delegated authority to issue such permits, 363 upon the payment of such reasonable fees adopted by the 364 enforcing agency. The enforcing agency is empowered to revoke 365 any such permit upon a determination by the agency that the 366 construction, erection, alteration, modification, repair, or 367 demolition of the building for which the permit was issued is in 368 violation of, or not in conformity with, the provisions of the 369 Florida Building Code. Whenever a permit required under this 370 section is denied or revoked because the plan, or the 371 construction, erection, alteration, modification, repair, or 372 demolition of a building, is found by the local enforcing agency 373 to be not in compliance with the Florida Building Code, the 374 local enforcing agency shall identify the specific plan or 375 project features that do not comply with the applicable codes, 376 identify the specific code chapters and sections upon which the 377 finding is based, and provide this information to the permit 378 applicant. A plans reviewer or building code administrator who 379 is responsible for issuing a denial, revocation, or modification 380 request but fails to provide to the permit applicant a reason 381 for denying, revoking, or requesting a modification, based on 382 compliance with the Florida Building Code or local ordinance, is 383 subject to disciplinary action against his or her license 384 pursuant to s. 468.621(1)(i). Installation, replacement, 385 removal, or metering of any load management control device is 386 exempt from and is shall not be subject to the permit process 387 and fees otherwise required by this section. 388 (b)âA local enforcement agency shall post each type of 389 building permit application, as adopted by the commission, 390 including a list of all required attachments, drawings, or other 391 requirements for each type of application, on its website. A 392 local enforcement agency must post and update the status of 393 every received application on its website until the issuance of 394 the building permit. A local enforcement agency shall allow 395 applicants to submit completed applications, including payments, 396 attachments, drawings, or other requirements or parts of the 397 completed permit application, must be able to be submitted 398 electronically to the appropriate building department. Accepted 399 methods of electronic submission include, but are not limited 400 to, e-mail submission of applications in Portable Document 401 Format or submission of applications through an electronic fill 402 in form available on the building departmentâs website or 403 through a third-party submission management software. A building 404 official may accept completed applications, including payments, 405 attachments, drawings, or other requirements or parts of the 406 completed permit application, may also be submitted in person in 407 a nonelectronic format, at the discretion of the building 408 official. 409 (c)âA local government that issues building permits may 410 send a written notice of expiration, by e-mail or United States 411 Postal Service, to the owner of the property and the contractor 412 listed on the permit, no less than 30 days before a building 413 permit is set to expire. The written notice must identify the 414 permit that is set to expire and the date the permit will 415 expire. A building permit issued by a local government for a 416 single-family dwelling expires 1 year after the issuance of the 417 permit or on the effective date of the next edition of the 418 Florida Building Code, whichever is later; however, this 419 paragraph does not prevent a local government from extending the 420 building permit beyond the expiration date. 421 (f)âA local government may not require a contract between a 422 builder and an owner, any copies of such contract, or any 423 associated document, including, but not limited to, letters of 424 intent, material costs lists, labor costs, or overhead or profit 425 statements, for the issuance of a building permit or as a 426 requirement for the submission of a building permit application. 427 Inspection fees may not be based on the total cost of a project 428 and may not exceed the actual inspection costs incurred by the 429 local enforcement agency. 430 (g)1.âA local government that issues building permits may 431 not require an owner of a single-family dwelling or the ownerâs 432 contractor to obtain a building permit to perform any work that 433 is valued at less than $7,500 on the ownerâs property. However, 434 a local government may require a building permit for any 435 electrical, plumbing, structural, mechanical, or gas work 436 performed on a lot containing a single-family dwelling, 437 regardless of the value of the work. A construction project may 438 not be divided into more than one project for the purpose of 439 evading the requirements of this section. 440 2.âFor any work performed by a person other than the 441 property owner under the exemption in subparagraph 1., the 442 person performing the work shall file a notice of permit 443 exemption with the local enforcement agency which includes the 444 name and license number of the person or entity hired to perform 445 the work, the scope of the work performed, the property address 446 at which the work was performed, and the value of such work as 447 proof that such work complies with subparagraph 1. A notice of 448 permit exemption must be filed within 30 days after the date the 449 work begins. A notice is not required for work performed 450 personally by the property owner. A local government has no 451 legal duty to the owner or contractor, or the ownerâs or 452 contractorâs successors or assigns, for work performed under 453 this paragraph. 454 (h)1.âExcept to the extent strictly necessary to maintain 455 compliance with the National Flood Insurance Program for 456 participating communities, a local government that issues 457 building permits may not require an owner of a single-family or 458 two-family dwelling, or the ownerâs contractor, to obtain a 459 building permit for the installation of temporary residential 460 hurricane and flood protection walls or barriers that meet all 461 of the following conditions: 462 a.âThe wall or barrier is nonhabitable and nonload-bearing 463 and is not more than 48 inches in height. 464 b.âThe wall or barrier is installed on the residential 465 property of a single-family or two-family dwelling or townhouse. 466 c.âThe wall or barrier does not render a code-compliant 467 building noncompliant with codes required at the time of 468 original construction. 469 d.âThe wall or barrier is constructed to mitigate or 470 prevent storm surge or floodwaters from entering a structure or 471 property. 472 e.âThe wall or barrier is installed by a contractor 473 licensed under part I of chapter 489. 474 f.âThe wall or barrier complies with applicable local 475 zoning, drainage, easement, and setback requirements. 476 g.âThe wall or barrier complies with ANSI/FM 2510 or is 477 designed and certified by a professional engineer licensed in 478 this state based on site-specific engineering analysis. 479 2.âA local government has no legal duty to the owner, 480 contractor, or their successors, or assigns for work performed 481 under this paragraph. 482 3.âThe commission may adopt rules pursuant to s. 120.54 to 483 incorporate necessary standards to implement this paragraph. 484 (i)âA local government that issues building permits may not 485 require a building permit for each lot or parcel upon which a 486 retaining wall is installed on the property of a single-family 487 or two-family residential dwelling or a townhouse. 488 (j)âThis subsection may not be construed to limit a local 489 governmentâs authority under this chapter to maintain compliance 490 with the regulations of the Federal Emergency Management Agency 491 or the National Flood Insurance Program, regardless of the value 492 of the work. 493 (24)(a)âA political subdivision of this state may not adopt 494 or enforce any ordinance or impose any building permit or other 495 development order requirement that: 496 1.âContains any building, construction, or aesthetic 497 requirement or condition that conflicts with or impairs 498 corporate trademarks, service marks, trade dress, logos, color 499 patterns, design scheme insignia, image standards, or other 500 features of corporate branding identity on real property or 501 improvements thereon used in activities conducted under chapter 502 526 or in carrying out business activities defined as a 503 franchise by Federal Trade Commission regulations in 16 C.F.R. 504 ss. 436.1, et. seq.; or 505 2.âImposes any requirement on the design, construction, or 506 location of signage advertising the retail price of gasoline in 507 accordance with the requirements of ss. 526.111 and 526.121 508 which prevents the signage from being clearly visible and 509 legible to drivers of approaching motor vehicles from a vantage 510 point on any lane of traffic in either direction on a roadway 511 abutting the gas station premises and meets height, width, and 512 spacing standards for Series C, D, or E signs, as applicable, 513 published in the latest edition of Standard Alphabets for 514 Highway Signs published by the United States Department of 515 Commerce, Bureau of Public Roads, Office of Highway Safety; or 516 3.âImposes a glazing requirement that results in the 517 glazing of more than 15 percent of the surface area of the 518 primary facade for the first 10 feet above the ground floor for 519 a proposed new commercial or mixed-use construction or 520 restoration project, except for individually listed contributing 521 structures in a National Register of Historic Places district. 522 Such glazing requirements may not be imposed or enforced on any 523 facade other than the primary facade, and such glazing 524 requirements may not be imposed or enforced on any portion of 525 the primary facade higher than the first 10 feet above the 526 ground floor. For purposes of this subparagraph, the term: 527 a.ââGlazingâ means the installation of transparent or 528 translucent materials, including glass or similar substances, in 529 windows, doors, or storefronts. The term includes any actual or 530 faux windows to be installed on a building facade. 531 b.ââPrimary facadeâ means the single building side housing 532 the primary entrance to the building. 533 Section 7.âSection 553.791, Florida Statutes, is amended to 534 read: 535 553.791âAlternative plans review and inspection.â 536 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 537 (a)ââApplicable codesâ means the Florida Building Code and 538 any local technical amendments to the Florida Building Code but 539 does not include the applicable minimum fire prevention and 540 firesafety codes adopted pursuant to chapter 633. 541 (b)ââAuditâ means the process to confirm that the building 542 code inspection services have been performed by the private 543 provider, including ensuring that the required affidavit for the 544 plan review has been properly completed and submitted with the 545 permit documents and that the minimum mandatory inspections 546 required under the building code have been performed and 547 properly recorded. The local building official may not replicate 548 the plan review or inspection being performed by the private 549 provider, unless expressly authorized by this section. 550 (c)ââBuildingâ means any construction, erection, 551 alteration, demolition, or improvement of, or addition to, any 552 structure or site work for which permitting by a local 553 enforcement agency is required. 554 (d)ââBuilding code inspection servicesâ means those 555 services described in s. 468.603(5) and (8) involving the review 556 of building plans as well as those services involving the review 557 of site plans and site work engineering plans or their 558 functional equivalent, to determine compliance with applicable 559 codes and those inspections required by law, conducted either in 560 person or virtually, of each phase of construction for which 561 permitting by a local enforcement agency is required to 562 determine compliance with applicable codes. 563 (e)ââDeliverâ or âdeliveryâ means any method of delivery 564 used in conventional business or commercial practice, including 565 delivery by electronic transmissions such as e-mail or 566 submission through an electronic fill-in form available on the 567 building departmentâs website or through a third-party 568 submission management software. 569 (f)ââDuly authorized representativeâ means an agent of the 570 private provider identified in the permit application who 571 reviews plans or performs inspections as provided by this 572 section and who is licensed as an engineer under chapter 471 or 573 as an architect under chapter 481 or who holds a standard or 574 provisional certificate under part XII of chapter 468. A duly 575 authorized representative who only holds a provisional 576 certificate under part XII of chapter 468 must be under the 577 direct supervision of a person licensed as a building code 578 administrator under part XII of chapter 468. 579 (g)ââElectronic signatureâ means any letters, characters, 580 or symbols manifested by electronic or similar means which are 581 executed or adopted by a party with an intent to authenticate a 582 writing or record. 583 (h)ââElectronic transmissionâ or âsubmitted electronicallyâ 584 means any form or process of communication not directly 585 involving the physical transfer of paper or another tangible 586 medium which is suitable for the retention, retrieval, and 587 reproduction of information by the recipient and is retrievable 588 in paper form by the receipt through an automated process. All 589 notices, documents, and applications provided for in this 590 section may be transmitted electronically and shall have the 591 same legal effect as if physically posted or mailed. 592 (i)ââElectronically postedâ means providing notices of 593 decisions, results, or records, including inspection records, 594 through the use of a website or other form of electronic 595 communication used to transmit or display information. 596 (j)ââImmediate threat to public safety and welfareâ means a 597 building code violation that, if allowed to persist, constitutes 598 an immediate hazard that could result in death, serious bodily 599 injury, or significant property damage. This paragraph does not 600 limit the authority of the local building official to issue a 601 Notice of Corrective Action at any time during the construction 602 of a building project or any portion of such project if the 603 official determines that a condition of the building or portion 604 thereof may constitute a hazard when the building is put into 605 use following completion as long as the condition cited is shown 606 to be in violation of the building code or approved plans. 607 (k)ââLocal building officialâ means the individual within 608 the governing jurisdiction responsible for direct regulatory 609 administration or supervision of plans review, enforcement, and 610 inspection of any construction, erection, alteration, 611 demolition, or substantial improvement of, or addition to, any 612 structure for which permitting is required to indicate 613 compliance with applicable codes and includes any duly 614 authorized designee of such person. 615 (l)ââPermit applicationâ means a properly completed and 616 submitted application for the requested building or construction 617 permit, including: 618 1.âThe plans reviewed by the private provider, or in the 619 case of a single-trade plans review where a private provider 620 uses an automated or software-based plans review system pursuant 621 to subsection (7) (6), the information reviewed by the automated 622 or software-based plans review system to determine compliance 623 with one or more applicable codes. 624 2.âThe affidavit from the private provider required under 625 subsection (7) (6). 626 3.âAny applicable fees. 627 4.âAny documents required by the local building official to 628 determine that the fee owner has secured all other government 629 approvals required by law. 630 (m)ââPlansâ means building plans, site engineering plans, 631 or site plans, or their functional equivalent, submitted by a 632 fee owner or fee ownerâs contractor to a private provider or 633 duly authorized representative for review. 634 (n)ââPrivate providerâ means a person licensed as a 635 building code administrator under part XII of chapter 468, as an 636 engineer under chapter 471, or as an architect under chapter 637 481. For purposes of performing inspections under this section 638 for additions and alterations that are limited to 1,000 square 639 feet or less to residential buildings, the term âprivate 640 providerâ also includes a person who holds a standard 641 certificate under part XII of chapter 468. 642 (o)ââPrivate provider firmâ means a business organization, 643 including a corporation, partnership, business trust, or other 644 legal entity, which offers services under this chapter to the 645 public through licensees who are acting as agents, employees, 646 officers, or partners of the firm. A person who is licensed as a 647 building code administrator under part XII of chapter 468, an 648 engineer under chapter 471, or an architect under chapter 481 649 may act as a private provider for an agent, employee, or officer 650 of the private provider firm. 651 (p)ââRegistrationâ means the roster of authorized private 652 provider firms held by each local enforcement agency. 653 (q)(p)ââRequest for certificate of occupancy or certificate 654 of completionâ means a properly completed and executed 655 application for: 656 1.âA certificate of occupancy or certificate of completion. 657 2.âA certificate of compliance from the private provider 658 required under subsection (15) (13). 659 3.âAny applicable fees. 660 4.âAny documents required by the local building official to 661 determine that the fee owner has secured all other government 662 approvals required by law. 663 (r)(q)ââSingle-trade inspectionâ or âsingle-trade plans 664 reviewâ means any inspection or plans review focused on a single 665 construction trade, such as plumbing, mechanical, or electrical. 666 The term includes, but is not limited to, inspections or plans 667 reviews of door or window replacements; fences and block walls 668 more than 6 feet high from the top of the wall to the bottom of 669 the footing; stucco or plastering; reroofing with no structural 670 alteration; solar energy and energy storage installations or 671 alterations; HVAC replacements; ductwork or fan replacements; 672 alteration or installation of wiring, lighting, and service 673 panels; water heater changeouts; sink replacements; and 674 repiping. 675 (s)(r)ââSite workâ means the portion of a construction 676 project that is not part of the building structure, including, 677 but not limited to, grading, excavation, landscape irrigation, 678 and installation of driveways. 679 (t)(s)ââStop-work orderâ means the issuance of any written 680 statement, written directive, or written order which states the 681 reason for the order and the conditions under which the cited 682 work will be permitted to resume. 683 (2)(a)âNotwithstanding any other law or local government 684 ordinance or local policy, the fee owner of a building or 685 structure, or the fee ownerâs contractor upon explicit written 686 authorization from the fee owner, may choose at any time to use 687 a private provider to provide plans review or building code 688 inspection services with regard to such building or structure 689 and may make payment directly to the private provider for the 690 provision of such services. All such services are shall be the 691 subject of a written contract between the private provider, or 692 the private providerâs firm, and the fee owner or the fee 693 ownerâs contractor, upon explicit written authorization of the 694 fee owner and a copy of such explicit written authorization 695 being submitted to the local building official. The local 696 enforcement agency may not require the contract to be provided 697 as part of the permit application or as a condition for issuing 698 a permit. The fee owner may elect to use a private provider to 699 provide plans review or required building inspections, or both. 700 However, if the fee owner or the fee ownerâs contractor uses a 701 private provider to provide plans review, the local building 702 official, in his or her discretion and pursuant to duly adopted 703 policies of the local enforcement agency, may require the fee 704 owner or the fee ownerâs contractor to use a private provider to 705 also provide required building inspections. 706 (b)âIf a fee an owner or the fee ownerâs contractor retains 707 a private provider for purposes of plans review or building 708 inspection services, the local jurisdiction must reduce the 709 permit fee by the amount of cost savings realized by the local 710 enforcement agency for not having to perform such services. Such 711 reduction may be calculated on a flat fee or percentage basis, 712 or any other reasonable means by which a local enforcement 713 agency assesses the cost for its plans review or inspection 714 services. The permit fee must be based on the cost incurred by 715 the local jurisdiction, including the labor cost of the 716 personnel providing such services and the clerical and 717 supervisory assistance required to comply with this section. The 718 local jurisdiction may not charge fees for plans review or 719 building inspections if the fee owner or the fee ownerâs 720 contractor hires a private provider to perform such services. 721 The local enforcement agency may not charge punitive 722 administrative fees when a fee owner has chosen to work with a 723 private provider; however, the local jurisdiction may charge a 724 reasonable administrative fee, which shall be based on the cost 725 that is actually incurred, including the labor cost of the 726 personnel providing the service, by the local jurisdiction or 727 attributable to the local jurisdiction for the clerical and 728 supervisory assistance required, or both. 729 (c)âIf a fee an owner or the fee ownerâs a contractor 730 retains a private provider for purposes of plans review or 731 building inspection services, the local jurisdiction must 732 provide equal access to all permitting and inspection documents 733 and reports to the private provider, fee owner, and contractor 734 if such access is provided by software that protects exempt 735 records from disclosure. Access to these documents must be 736 promptly provided. 737 (d)âIf a fee owner or a fee ownerâs contractor retains a 738 private provider for purposes of plans review or building 739 inspection services for a commercial construction project, the 740 local enforcement agency must reduce the permit fee by at least 741 25 percent of the portion of the permit fee attributable to 742 plans review or building inspection services, as applicable. If 743 a fee owner or a fee ownerâs contractor retains a private 744 provider for all required plans review and building inspection 745 services, the local enforcement agency must reduce the total 746 permit fee by at least 50 percent of the amount otherwise 747 charged for such services. If a local enforcement agency does 748 not reduce such fee by at least the percentages provided in this 749 paragraph, the local enforcement agency forfeits the ability to 750 collect any fees for the commercial construction project. The 751 surcharge required by s. 553.721 must be calculated based on the 752 reduced permit fee. This paragraph does not prohibit a local 753 enforcement agency from reducing its fees in excess of the 754 percentages provided in this paragraph. 755 (e)âA local government or local building official may not 756 require additional forms beyond those required at registration, 757 except for the written notice required under subsection (5), if 758 a fee owner or the fee ownerâs contractor uses a private 759 provider. 760 (3)âA private provider and any duly authorized 761 representative may only perform building code inspection 762 services that are within the disciplines covered by that 763 personâs licensure or certification under chapter 468, chapter 764 471, or chapter 481, including single-trade inspections. A 765 private provider may not provide building code inspection 766 services pursuant to this section upon any building designed or 767 constructed by the private provider or the private providerâs 768 firm. 769 (4)âA local enforcement agency shall create a registration 770 system for private providers and private provider firms working 771 in the local enforcement agencyâs jurisdiction. The local 772 enforcement agency shall establish a method to register and 773 update registration information electronically. The local 774 enforcement agency may not charge an administrative fee for 775 registration or updates to a registration. The private provider 776 or private provider firm shall provide its contact information 777 and verify compliance with the licensure requirements of 778 paragraph (1)(n) or paragraph (1)(o), as applicable, and the 779 insurance requirements of subsection (20). The private provider 780 or private provider firm shall register with the local 781 enforcement agency in the jurisdiction in which the provider or 782 firm is working before contracting to provide services in such 783 jurisdiction. The private provider or private provider firm must 784 update its registration within 5 business days after any change 785 to the providerâs or firmâs contact information, licensure, or 786 insurance coverage. 787 (5)(4)âA fee owner or the fee ownerâs contractor using a 788 private provider to provide building code inspection services 789 shall notify the local building official in writing at the time 790 of permit application, or by 2 p.m. local time, 2 business days 791 before the first scheduled inspection by the local building 792 official or building code enforcement agency that a private 793 provider has been contracted to perform the required inspections 794 of construction under this section, including single-trade 795 inspections, on a form to be adopted by the commission. The 796 local enforcement agency may not alter the form. Such This 797 notice must shall include the following information: 798 (a)âThe services to be performed by the private provider. 799 (b)âThe name, firm, address, telephone number, and e-mail 800 address of each private provider who is performing or will 801 perform such services, his or her professional license or 802 certification number, qualification statements or resumes, and, 803 if required by the local building official, a certificate of 804 insurance demonstrating that professional liability insurance 805 coverage is in place for the private providerâs firm, the 806 private provider, and any duly authorized representative in the 807 amounts required by this section. 808 (c)âAn acknowledgment from the fee owner or the fee ownerâs 809 contractor in substantially the following form: 810 811 I have elected to use one or more private providers to 812 provide building code plans review and/or inspection 813 services on the building or structure that is the 814 subject of the enclosed permit application, as 815 authorized by s. 553.791, Florida Statutes. I 816 understand that the local building official may not 817 review the plans submitted or perform the required 818 building inspections to determine compliance with the 819 applicable codes, except to the extent specified in 820 said law. Instead, plans review and/or required 821 building inspections will be performed by licensed or 822 certified personnel identified in the application. The 823 law requires minimum insurance requirements for such 824 personnel, but I understand that I may require more 825 insurance to protect my interests. By executing this 826 form, I acknowledge that I have made inquiry regarding 827 the competence of the licensed or certified personnel 828 and the level of their insurance and am satisfied that 829 my interests are adequately protected. I agree to 830 indemnify, defend, and hold harmless the local 831 government, the local building official, and their 832 building code enforcement personnel from any and all 833 claims arising from my use of these licensed or 834 certified personnel to perform building code 835 inspection services with respect to the building or 836 structure that is the subject of the enclosed permit 837 application. 838 839 If the fee owner or the fee ownerâs contractor makes any changes 840 to the listed private providers or the services to be provided 841 by those private providers, the fee owner or the fee ownerâs 842 contractor must shall, within 1 business day after any change or 843 within 2 business days before the next scheduled inspection, 844 update the notice to reflect such changes. A change of a duly 845 authorized representative named in the permit application does 846 not require a revision of the permit, and the building code 847 enforcement agency may shall not charge a fee for making the 848 change. 849 (6)(5)âAfter construction has commenced and if either the 850 local building official is unable to provide inspection services 851 in a timely manner or the work subject to inspection is related 852 to a single-trade inspection for a single-family or two-family 853 dwelling, the fee owner or the fee ownerâs contractor may elect 854 to use a private provider to provide inspection services for a 855 single-trade inspection for a single-family or two-family 856 dwelling by notifying the local building official of the ownerâs 857 or contractorâs intention to do so by 2 p.m. local time, 2 858 business days before the next scheduled inspection using the 859 notice provided for in paragraphs (5)(a)-(c) (4)(a)-(c). 860 (7)(6)âA private provider performing plans review under 861 this section shall review the plans to determine compliance with 862 the applicable codes. For single-trade plans reviews, a private 863 provider may use an automated or software-based plans review 864 system designed to determine compliance with one or more 865 applicable codes, including, but not limited to, the National 866 Electrical Code and the Florida Building Code. Upon determining 867 that the plans reviewed comply with the applicable codes, the 868 private provider shall prepare an affidavit or affidavits 869 certifying, under oath, that the following is true and correct 870 to the best of the private providerâs knowledge and belief: 871 (a)âThe plans were reviewed by the affiant, who is duly 872 authorized to perform plans review pursuant to this section and 873 holds the appropriate license or certificate. 874 (b)âThe plans comply with the applicable codes. 875 876 Such affidavit may bear a written or electronic signature and 877 may be submitted electronically to the local building official. 878 A local enforcement agency must accept electronically submitted 879 affidavits. 880 (8)(a)âThe local building official may not review plans, 881 construction drawings, or any other related documents determined 882 by a private provider to be compliant with the applicable codes 883 except to the extent necessary to determine compliance with 884 local ordinances, floodplain management regulations, site review 885 requirements, and any other administrative or life safety review 886 unrelated to building code compliance. 887 (b)âThe local building official may review other forms and 888 documents required under this section for completeness only. The 889 local building official must provide written notice to a permit 890 applicant of any incomplete forms or documents required under 891 this section no later than 10 days after receipt of a permit 892 application or, if the permit application is related to a 893 single-trade plans review for a single-family or two-family 894 dwelling, no later than 5 business days after receipt of a 895 permit application, and an affidavit from the private provider 896 as required in subsection (7). The written notice must state 897 with specificity which forms or documents are incomplete. 898 (7)(a)âNo more than 20 business days, or if the permit 899 application is related to a single-trade plans review for a 900 single-family or two-family dwelling, no more than 5 business 901 days, after receipt of a permit application and the affidavit 902 from the private provider required pursuant to subsection (6), 903 the local building official shall issue the requested permit or 904 provide a written notice to the permit applicant identifying the 905 specific plan features that do not comply with the applicable 906 codes, as well as the specific code chapters and sections. If 907 the local building official does not provide such a written 908 notice of the plan deficiencies within the prescribed time 909 period, the permit application must be deemed approved as a 910 matter of law, and the permit must be issued by the local 911 building official on the next business day. 912 (c)(b)âIf the local building official provides a written 913 notice of plan deficiencies to the permit applicant of any 914 incomplete forms or documents required under this section at the 915 time of plan submission within the prescribed time period, such 916 the time period is tolled pending resolution of the matter. To 917 resolve the issues raised in the notice plan deficiencies, the 918 permit applicant may elect to dispute the issues deficiencies 919 pursuant to subsection (17) (15) or to submit revisions to 920 correct the issues deficiencies. 921 (d)(c)âIf the permit applicant submits revisions, the local 922 building official has the remainder of the tolled 10-day or 5 923 day time period plus 5 business days after the date of 924 resubmittal to issue the requested permit or to provide a second 925 written notice to the permit applicant stating which of the 926 previously identified forms or documents plan features remain 927 incomplete in noncompliance with the applicable codes, with 928 specific reference to the relevant code chapters and sections. 929 Any subsequent review by the local building official is limited 930 to the issues deficiencies cited in the original written notice. 931 If the local building official does not provide the second 932 written notice within the prescribed time period, the permit 933 must be deemed approved as a matter of law, and the local 934 building official must issue the permit on the next business 935 day. 936 (e)(d)âIf the local building official provides a second 937 written notice of plan deficiencies to the permit applicant 938 within the prescribed time period, the permit applicant may 939 elect to dispute the issues raised in the second notice 940 deficiencies pursuant to subsection (17) (15) or to submit 941 additional revisions to correct the issues deficiencies. For all 942 revisions submitted after the first revision, the local building 943 official has an additional 5 business days after the date of 944 resubmittal to issue the requested permit or to provide a 945 written notice to the permit applicant stating which of the 946 previously identified forms or documents plan features remain 947 incomplete. If the local building official does not provide the 948 notice within the prescribed time period, the permit is deemed 949 approved as a matter of law, and the local building official 950 must issue the permit on the next business day in noncompliance 951 with the applicable codes, with specific reference to the 952 relevant code chapters and sections. 953 (9)(8)âA private provider performing required inspections 954 under this section shall inspect each phase of construction as 955 required by the applicable codes. Such inspection, including a 956 single-trade inspection, may be performed in person or 957 virtually. The private provider may have a duly authorized 958 representative perform the required inspections, provided all 959 required reports are prepared by and bear the written or 960 electronic signature of the private provider or the private 961 providerâs duly authorized representative. The duly authorized 962 representative must be an employee of the private provider 963 entitled to receive reemployment assistance benefits under 964 chapter 443. The contractorâs contractual or legal obligations 965 are not relieved by any action of the private provider. 966 (10)(9)âA private provider performing required inspections 967 under this section shall provide notice to the local building 968 official of the approximate date and time of any such 969 inspection. The local building official may not prohibit the 970 private provider from performing any inspection outside the 971 local building officialâs normal operating hours, including 972 after hours, weekends, or holidays. The local building official 973 may visit the building site as often as necessary to verify that 974 the private provider is performing all required inspections. A 975 deficiency notice must be posted by the private provider, the 976 duly authorized representative of the private provider, or the 977 building department whenever a noncomplying item related to the 978 building code or the permitted documents is found. Such notice 979 may be physically posted at the job site or electronically 980 posted. After corrections are made, the item must be reinspected 981 by the private provider or the representative of the private 982 provider before being concealed. Reinspection or reaudit fees 983 shall not be charged by The local jurisdiction may not charge 984 reinspection or reaudit fees as a result of the local 985 jurisdictionâs audit inspection occurring before the performance 986 of the private providerâs inspection or for any other 987 administrative matter not involving the detection of a violation 988 of the building code or a permit requirement. 989 (11)âA local enforcement agency is not responsible for the 990 regulatory administration or supervision of building code 991 inspection services performed by a private provider hired by a 992 fee owner or the fee ownerâs contractor. A local enforcement 993 agency may not require additional verification of licensure or 994 insurance requirements beyond that which is required at 995 registration. 996 (12)(10)âIf the private provider is a person licensed as an 997 engineer under chapter 471 or an architect under chapter 481 and 998 affixes his or her professional seal to the affidavit required 999 under subsection (7) (6), the local building official must issue 1000 the requested permit or provide a written notice to the permit 1001 applicant identifying the specific plan features that do not 1002 comply with the applicable codes, as well as the specific code 1003 chapters and sections, within 10 business days after receipt of 1004 the permit application and affidavit. In such written notice, 1005 the local building official must provide with specificity the 1006 planâs deficiencies, the reasons the permit application failed, 1007 and the applicable codes being violated. If the local building 1008 official does not provide specific written notice to the permit 1009 applicant within the prescribed 10-day period, the permit 1010 application is deemed approved as a matter of law, and the local 1011 building official must issue the permit on the next business 1012 day. 1013 (13)(11)âIf equipment replacements and repairs must be 1014 performed in an emergency situation, subject to the emergency 1015 permitting provisions of the Florida Building Code, a private 1016 provider may perform emergency inspection services without first 1017 notifying the local building official pursuant to subsection 1018 (9). A private provider must conduct the inspection within 3 1019 business days after being contacted to conduct an emergency 1020 inspection and must submit the inspection report to the local 1021 building official within 1 day after the inspection is 1022 completed. 1023 (14)(12)âUpon completing the required inspections at each 1024 applicable phase of construction, the private provider shall 1025 record such inspections on a form provided by the commission 1026 acceptable to the local building official. The form must bear 1027 the written or electronic signature of the private provider or 1028 the private providerâs duly authorized representative. Such 1029 These inspection records must shall reflect those inspections 1030 required by the applicable codes of each phase of construction 1031 for which permitting by a local enforcement agency is required. 1032 The private provider, upon completion of the required 1033 inspection, shall post each completed inspection record, 1034 indicating pass or fail, and provide the record to the local 1035 building official within 4 2 business days. Such inspection 1036 record may be electronically posted by the private provider, or 1037 the private provider may post such inspection record physically 1038 at the project site. The private provider may electronically 1039 transmit the record to the local building official. The local 1040 building official may waive the requirement to provide a record 1041 of each inspection within 4 2 business days if the record is 1042 electronically posted or posted at the project site and all such 1043 inspection records are submitted with the certificate of 1044 compliance. Unless the records have been electronically posted 1045 or transmitted, records of all required and completed 1046 inspections must shall be maintained at the building site at all 1047 times and made available for review by the local building 1048 official. A local building official may not fail any inspection 1049 performed by a private provider for not having the inspection 1050 records at the job site if the inspection records have been 1051 electronically transmitted to the local building official within 1052 the 4-business-day requirement. The private provider shall 1053 report to the local enforcement agency any condition that poses 1054 an immediate threat to public safety and welfare. 1055 (15)(13)âUpon completion of all required inspections, the 1056 private provider firm shall prepare a certificate of compliance, 1057 on a form provided by the commission acceptable to the local 1058 building official, summarizing the inspections performed and 1059 including a written representation, under oath, that the stated 1060 inspections have been performed and that, to the best of the 1061 private providerâs knowledge and belief, the building 1062 construction inspected complies with the approved plans and 1063 applicable codes. The certificate of compliance may be signed by 1064 any qualified licensed individual employed full time by the 1065 private provider firm under whose authority the inspection was 1066 completed. The statement required of the private provider must 1067 shall be substantially in the following form and must shall be 1068 signed and sealed by a private provider as established in 1069 subsection (1) or may be electronically transmitted to the local 1070 building official: 1071 1072 To the best of my knowledge and belief, the building 1073 components and site improvements outlined herein and 1074 inspected under my authority have been completed in 1075 conformance with the approved plans and the applicable 1076 codes. 1077 1078 (16)(a)(14)(a)âThe local building official may only perform 1079 building inspections of construction that a private provider has 1080 determined to be compliant with the applicable codes if the 1081 local building official has actual knowledge that the private 1082 provider did not perform the required inspections. If the local 1083 building official has such knowledge, the local building 1084 official must provide to the private provider written notice of 1085 the facts and circumstances upon which the local building 1086 official relied for such knowledge before performing a required 1087 inspection. The local building official may review forms and 1088 documents required under this section for completeness only. No 1089 more than 10 business days, or if the permit is related to 1090 single-family or two-family dwellings then no more than 2 1091 business days, after receipt of a request for a certificate of 1092 occupancy or certificate of completion and the applicantâs 1093 presentation of a certificate of compliance and approval of all 1094 other government approvals required by law, including the 1095 payment of all outstanding fees, the local building official 1096 shall issue the certificate of occupancy or certificate of 1097 completion or provide a notice to the applicant of any 1098 incomplete forms or documents required under this section 1099 identifying the specific deficiencies, as well as the specific 1100 code chapters and sections. 1101 (b)âIf the local building official does not provide notice 1102 of any incomplete forms or documents the deficiencies within the 1103 applicable time periods under paragraph (a), the request for a 1104 certificate of occupancy or certificate of completion is 1105 automatically granted and deemed issued as of the next business 1106 day. The local building official must provide the applicant with 1107 the written certificate of occupancy or certificate of 1108 completion within 10 days after it is automatically granted and 1109 issued. To resolve any identified issues deficiencies, the 1110 applicant may elect to dispute the issues deficiencies pursuant 1111 to subsection (17) (15) or to submit a corrected request for a 1112 certificate of occupancy or certificate of completion. 1113 (17)(15)âIf the local building official determines that the 1114 building construction or plans do not comply with the applicable 1115 codes, the official may deny the permit or request for a 1116 certificate of occupancy or certificate of completion, as 1117 appropriate, or may issue a stop-work order for the project or 1118 any portion thereof as provided by law, if the official 1119 determines that the noncompliance poses an immediate threat to 1120 public safety and welfare, subject to the following: 1121 (a)âThe local building official must shall be available to 1122 meet with the private provider within 2 business days to resolve 1123 any dispute after issuing a stop-work order or providing notice 1124 to the applicant denying a permit or request for a certificate 1125 of occupancy or certificate of completion. 1126 (b)âIf the local building official and private provider are 1127 unable to resolve the dispute, the matter must shall be referred 1128 to the local enforcement agencyâs board of appeals, if one 1129 exists, which must shall consider the matter at its next 1130 scheduled meeting or sooner. Any decisions by the local 1131 enforcement agencyâs board of appeals, or local building 1132 official if there is no board of appeals, may be appealed to the 1133 commission as provided by this chapter. 1134 (c)âNotwithstanding any provision of this section, any 1135 decisions regarding the issuance of a building permit, 1136 certificate of occupancy, or certificate of completion may be 1137 reviewed by the local enforcement agencyâs board of appeals, if 1138 one exists. Any decision by the local enforcement agencyâs board 1139 of appeals, or local building official if there is no board of 1140 appeals, may be appealed to the commission as provided by this 1141 chapter, which shall consider the matter at the commissionâs 1142 next scheduled meeting. 1143 (18)(16)âFor the purposes of this section, any notice to be 1144 provided by the local building official is shall be deemed to be 1145 provided to the person or entity when successfully transmitted 1146 to the e-mail address listed for that person or entity in the 1147 permit application or revised permit application, or, if no e 1148 mail address is stated, when actually received by that person or 1149 entity. 1150 (19)(a)(17)(a)âA local enforcement agency, local building 1151 official, or local government may not adopt or enforce any laws, 1152 rules, procedures, policies, qualifications, or standards more 1153 stringent than those prescribed by this section. 1154 (b)âA local enforcement agency, local building official, or 1155 local government may establish, for private providers, private 1156 provider firms, and duly authorized representatives working 1157 within that jurisdiction, a system of registration to verify 1158 compliance with the licensure requirements of paragraph (1)(n) 1159 and the insurance requirements of subsection (18). 1160 (b)(c)âThis section does not limit the authority of the 1161 local building official to issue a stop-work order for a 1162 building project or any portion of the project, as provided by 1163 law, if the official determines that a condition on the building 1164 site constitutes an immediate threat to public safety and 1165 welfare. 1166 (c)âA local enforcement agency may not prohibit or limit 1167 private providers from using virtual inspections if a virtual 1168 inspection is not prohibited by any applicable code. 1169 (20)(18)âA private provider may perform building code 1170 inspection services on a building project under this section 1171 only if the private provider maintains insurance for 1172 professional liability covering all services performed as a 1173 private provider. Such insurance must shall have minimum policy 1174 limits of $1 million per occurrence and $2 million in the 1175 aggregate for any project with a construction cost of $5 million 1176 or less and $2 million per occurrence and $4 million in the 1177 aggregate for any project with a construction cost of over $5 1178 million. Nothing in this section limits the ability of a fee 1179 owner to require additional insurance or higher policy limits. 1180 For these purposes, the term âconstruction costâ means the total 1181 cost of building construction as stated in the building permit 1182 application. If the private provider chooses to secure claims 1183 made coverage to fulfill this requirement, the private provider 1184 must also maintain coverage for a minimum of 5 years after 1185 subsequent to the performance of building code inspection 1186 services. The insurance required under this subsection must 1187 shall be written only by insurers authorized to do business in 1188 this state with a minimum A.M. Bestâs rating of A. Before 1189 providing building code inspection services within a local 1190 building officialâs jurisdiction, a private provider must 1191 provide to the local building official a certificate of 1192 insurance evidencing that the coverages required under this 1193 subsection are in force. 1194 (21)(19)âWhen performing building code inspection services, 1195 a private provider is subject to the disciplinary guidelines of 1196 the applicable professional board with jurisdiction over his or 1197 her license or certification under chapter 468, chapter 471, or 1198 chapter 481. All private providers are shall be subject to the 1199 disciplinary guidelines of s. 468.621(1)(c)-(h). Any complaint 1200 processing, investigation, and discipline that arise out of a 1201 private providerâs performance of building code inspection 1202 services must shall be conducted by the applicable professional 1203 board. 1204 (22)(20)âA local building code enforcement agency may not 1205 audit the performance of building code inspection services by 1206 private providers operating within the local jurisdiction until 1207 the agency has created standard operating private provider audit 1208 procedures for the agencyâs internal inspection and review 1209 staff, which includes, at a minimum, the private provider audit 1210 purpose and scope, private provider audit criteria, an 1211 explanation of private provider audit processes and objections, 1212 and detailed findings of areas of noncompliance. Such private 1213 provider audit procedures must be publicly available online, and 1214 a printed version must be readily accessible in agency 1215 buildings. The private provider audit results of staff for the 1216 prior two quarters also must be publicly available. The agencyâs 1217 audit processes must adhere to the agencyâs posted standard 1218 operating audit procedures. The same private provider or private 1219 provider firm may not be audited more than four times in a year 1220 unless the local building official determines a condition of a 1221 building constitutes an immediate threat to public safety and 1222 welfare, which must be communicated in writing to the private 1223 provider or private provider firm. The private provider or 1224 private provider firm must be given notice of each audit to be 1225 performed at least 5 business days before the audit. Work on a 1226 building or structure may proceed after inspection and approval 1227 by a private provider. The work may not be delayed for 1228 completion of an inspection audit by the local building code 1229 enforcement agency. 1230 (23)(21)âThe local government, the local building official, 1231 and their building code enforcement personnel are shall be 1232 immune from liability to any person or party for any action or 1233 inaction by a fee owner of a building, or by a private provider 1234 or its duly authorized representative, in connection with 1235 building code inspection services as authorized in this act. The 1236 local government, local enforcement agency, local building 1237 official, and building code enforcement personnel may not 1238 prohibit or discourage the use of a private provider or a 1239 private provider firm. 1240 (24)(22)âNotwithstanding any other law, a county, a 1241 municipality, a school district, or an independent special 1242 district may use a private provider or a private provider firm, 1243 or may employ a licensed building inspector as described in s. 1244 468.603 or a person who holds the same licensure or 1245 certification as a private provider, to provide building code 1246 inspection services for a public works project, an improvement, 1247 a building, or any other structure that is owned by the county, 1248 municipality, school district, or independent special district. 1249 Section 8.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 1250 553.792, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1251 553.792âBuilding permit application to local government.â 1252 (1)(a)âA local government must approve, approve with 1253 conditions, or deny a building permit application after receipt 1254 of a completed and sufficient application within the following 1255 timeframes, unless the applicant waives such timeframes in 1256 writing: 1257 1.âWithin 5 business days after receiving a complete and 1258 sufficient application, for an applicant using a local 1259 government plans reviewer to obtain the following building 1260 permits for an existing single-family residential dwelling if 1261 the value of the work is less than $15,000: structural, 1262 accessory structure, alarm, electrical, gas, irrigation, 1263 landscaping, mechanical, plumbing, or roofing. 1264 2.1.âWithin 30 business days after receiving a complete and 1265 sufficient application, for an applicant using a local 1266 government plans reviewer to obtain the following building 1267 permits if the structure is less than 7,500 square feet: 1268 residential units, including a single-family residential unit or 1269 a single-family residential dwelling, accessory structure, 1270 alarm, electrical, irrigation, landscaping, mechanical, 1271 plumbing, or roofing. 1272 3.2.âWithin 60 business days after receiving a complete and 1273 sufficient application, for an applicant using a local 1274 government plans reviewer to obtain the following building 1275 permits if the structure is 7,500 square feet or more: 1276 residential units, including a single-family residential unit or 1277 a single-family residential dwelling, accessory structure, 1278 alarm, electrical, irrigation, landscaping, mechanical, 1279 plumbing, or roofing. 1280 4.3.âWithin 60 business days after receiving a complete and 1281 sufficient application, for an applicant using a local 1282 government plans reviewer to obtain the following building 1283 permits: signs or nonresidential buildings that are less than 1284 25,000 square feet. 1285 5.4.âWithin 60 business days after receiving a complete and 1286 sufficient application, for an applicant using a local 1287 government plans reviewer to obtain the following building 1288 permits: multifamily residential, not exceeding 50 units; site 1289 plan approvals and subdivision plats not requiring public 1290 hearing or public notice; and lot grading and site alteration. 1291 6.5.âWithin 12 business days after receiving a complete and 1292 sufficient application, for an applicant using a master building 1293 permit consistent with s. 553.794 to obtain a site-specific 1294 building permit. 1295 7.6.âWithin 10 business days after receiving a complete and 1296 sufficient application, for an applicant for a single-family 1297 residential dwelling applied for by a contractor licensed in 1298 this state on behalf of a property owner who participates in a 1299 Community Development Block Grant-Disaster Recovery program 1300 administered by the Department of Commerce, unless the permit 1301 application fails to satisfy the Florida Building Code or the 1302 enforcing agencyâs laws or ordinances. 1303 1304 However, the local government may not require the waiver of the 1305 timeframes in this section as a condition precedent to reviewing 1306 an applicantâs building permit application. 1307 Section 9.âParagraph (c) is added to subsection (1) of 1308 section 720.3035, Florida Statutes, to read: 1309 720.3035âArchitectural control covenants; parcel owner 1310 improvements; rights and privileges.â 1311 (1) 1312 (c)âAn association or any architectural, construction 1313 improvement, or other such similar committee of an association 1314 may not require a building permit to be issued by a governmental 1315 authority to a parcel owner as a prerequisite for review by the 1316 association or committee concerning the construction of 1317 structures or improvements on the parcel. 1318 Section 10.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.